Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 7

Fiscal Review Committee

3-7-101. Creation — Membership.

There is created a special, continuing committee of the general assembly, to be known as the fiscal review committee.

It shall be composed of the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chair of the senate standing committee on finance, ways and means (or if the committee has co-chairs, then one (1) of them, to be designated by the speaker), the chair of the house standing committee on finance, ways and means (or if the committee has co-chairs, then one (1) of them, to be designated by the speaker), all ex officio members, and fourteen (14) members to be elected as follows:

Seven (7) senators and seven (7) representatives to be elected by the respective houses of the general assembly, with each house to elect an appropriate number of members from each of the two (2) major political parties so that the political make-up of the committee, exclusive of the speakers, shall reflect as nearly as possible the same ratio of members of such parties as the parties are represented in the respective houses. Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1)(A), however, no political party shall have less than two (2) elective members from each house of the general assembly.

After committee membership is selected pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) and subsection (c), if the required political party ratio or minimum representation is undermined by changed circumstances other than a vacancy in the committee membership, then the required party ratio or minimum representation shall be promptly restored via appointment of an additional interim member or members by the appropriate speaker. The term of any member so appointed shall terminate at the next regular election of committee membership conducted pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) and subsection (c).

Committee members shall serve for their full term of office as legislators and until their successors are selected and qualified, if reelected to either house of the general assembly. Members are eligible to succeed themselves as members of the committee. As terms expire, successors shall be selected during the fifteen-day organizational session of each general assembly.

Vacancies among the membership shall be filled in the same manner as in the original selection of members, except that in the case of a vacancy in the elected membership when the general assembly is not in session, the speaker of the body from which the originally elected member came shall appoint a successor, who shall be from the same political party as the member's predecessor.

The committee shall elect from its membership a chair, a vice chair, and such other officers as it considers necessary. The chair and vice chair shall be of opposite houses of the general assembly so that one (1) is a member of the senate and one (1) is a member of the house of representatives. The chair and vice chair positions shall rotate between the senate and house of representatives every two (2) years.

All members of the committee, exclusive of the speakers, shall be voting members.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 1; 1967, ch. 198, § 1; 1969, ch. 190, § 1; modified; Acts 1973, ch. 199, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-701; Acts 1981, ch. 28, § 1; 2006, ch. 646, § 2; 2015, ch. 297, § 1; 2019, ch. 476, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the last two sentences in (e).

The 2019 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, substituted “fourteen (14) members” for “fifteen (15) members” near the end of (b)(1)(A); and substituted “Seven (7) senators and seven (7) representatives” for “Six (6) senators and nine (9) representatives” at the beginning of (b)(1)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 297, § 2. April 24, 2015.

Acts 2019, ch. 476, § 4. January 1, 2021.

Cross-References. Fiscal notes prepared by fiscal review committee required with revenue bills, §3-2-107.

Law Reviews.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Attorney General Opinions. Fiscal review committee membership is not required to be changed when, as a result of a member's change in party affiliation, one party has fewer than two elective members on the committee, OAG 06-036 (2/21/06).

3-7-102. Meetings — Subcommittees — Expenses.

The committee shall meet at least once in each fiscal quarter on such dates as it shall choose and at such other times as it considers necessary or upon call of the chair.

The committee may create subcommittees for such purposes as it considers advisable.

Members of the committee are entitled to be reimbursed for their expenses in attending meetings of the committee or any subcommittee thereof (including a mileage allowance for travel expenses), at the same rates and in the same manner as when attending the general assembly.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 2; 1967, ch. 198, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-702.

Cross-References. Reimbursement of general assembly members for expenses and mileage, §3-1-106.

3-7-103. Purpose of committee — Duties of committee and comptroller.

The purpose of the committee is to become knowledgeable about the fiscal affairs of the state and to use every means of imparting this knowledge to the members of the general assembly, it being the function of the committee to conduct a continuing review of such items as revenue collections, budget requests from the several spending agencies of the state, the recommended executive budget, appropriations, work programs, allotments, reserves, impoundments, the state debt, and the condition of the various state funds.

The fiscal review committee has the responsibility of preparing and distributing the fiscal note statements required in § 3-2-107.

The committee shall also call on the staff of the office of legal services, the office of legislative services [repealed], or the office of legislative administration of the general assembly for such advice or services as it may require.

The comptroller of the treasury shall make quarterly reports to the committee concerning the state's fiscal affairs, which reports shall concern such subjects and be of such scope and depth as the committee may direct.

The comptroller of the treasury shall also perform such other duties and furnish such other information or services from time to time as the committee or any subcommittee thereof shall direct.

In carrying out the responsibilities of the committee, the committee, any subcommittee thereof, the staff director, or the comptroller of the treasury shall call upon the department of finance and administration, the department of revenue, the department of the treasury, and other executive, legislative, and judicial departments and agencies of state government for such information as the committee desires, and it is the duty of such departments and agencies to furnish promptly the desired information upon request of the comptroller of the treasury, the staff director, the committee or any subcommittee thereof.

The committee, with the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration, or appointed members of their respective staffs, shall review at least annually the organization and operation of state government in order to determine if changes need to be made.

The comptroller of the treasury may delegate certain responsibilities in connection with serving the committee to one (1) or more members of the staff of the comptroller of the treasury, but shall be responsible to the committee and shall be personally available to the committee upon its request.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 3; 1967, ch. 198, § 3; 1968, ch. 526, § 1; 1971, ch. 24, § 1; 1977, ch. 89, § 21; T.C.A., § 3-703; Acts 2012, ch. 833, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. There is no statutory provision for the staff director referred to in this section; however, there is authority in §3-7-107 to employ an executive director and “such other personnel” as is required in performance of duties.

Acts 2010, ch. 1077, § 1 repealed provisions concerning the office of legislative services, effective June 21, 2010.

Cross-References. Advisory group for sick leave bank for state legislative employees, §8-50-945.

Fiscal notes prepared by fiscal review committee required with revenue bills, §3-2-107.

Executive director and other personnel, §3-7-107.

3-7-104. Committee representation at executive budget meetings — Documents concerning budget and appropriations.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall give the committee as much advance notice as possible of any formal meeting, hearing, or conference concerning the formulation of the executive budget for submission to the general assembly, and shall give the committee an opportunity to be represented at such meeting, hearing, or conference. The committee may be represented, at the direction of the committee or its chair, by one (1) or more of its members or by the comptroller of the treasury or by one (1) or more members of the staff of the comptroller of the treasury, or by any consultants or other staff, or by any combination thereof.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall, upon receipt thereof, furnish to the comptroller of the treasury and staff director copies of the estimated expenditure requirements, budget requests, proposed work programs and allotment requests from the various departments and agencies, and upon completion thereof, copies of revenue estimates, the approved or revised budgets, work programs and allotments for the various departments and agencies, the budget document, the appropriation bill, and any other documents pertinent to the state budget and appropriations.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 4; 1967, ch. 198, § 4; 1968, ch. 526, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-704.

Compiler's Notes. There is no statutory provision for the staff director referred to in this section; however, there is authority in §3-7-107 to employ an executive director and “such other personnel” as is required in performance of duties.

Cross-References. Fiscal notes prepared by the fiscal review committee for the legislature while in session, §3-2-107.

3-7-105. Reports.

The committee shall report at least quarterly to the general assembly, and shall make such special reports to such standing committees as it thinks appropriate, concerning its work and may include any recommendation it wishes to make pertaining to the state's fiscal affairs.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 5; 1967, ch. 198, § 5; T.C.A., § 3-705.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

3-7-106. Subpoenas — Oaths.

In carrying out its work, the committee is authorized to issue subpoenas, including subpoenas duces tecum, to enforce the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, documents, papers, or other items of evidence, and to administer oaths to persons testifying before the committee.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 6; 1967, ch. 198, § 6; T.C.A., § 3-706.

3-7-107. Executive director and other personnel.

Beginning July 1, 2020, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall jointly appoint an executive director of the fiscal review committee. The executive director serves at the pleasure of the speakers; provided, however, in order to remove an executive director after July 1, 2020, both speakers must agree to the removal.

The executive director must be chosen without reference to party affiliation but solely on the basis of fitness to perform the duties of the office. The executive director must be a graduate of an accredited college or university and have five (5) or more years of experience in the field of professional financial management, administrative services management or related professional managerial experience, or governmental experience in relation to the fiscal or budget process. The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives will determine the compensation of the executive director.

Personnel shall be employed on recommendation of the executive director with the approval of the fiscal review committee. Personnel must be chosen without reference to party affiliation but solely on the basis of fitness to perform the duties of the office. The compensation of fiscal review personnel will be determined by the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, upon recommendation of the executive director.

The office of legislative administration shall assist the fiscal review committee with personnel, payroll, and other administrative functions.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 7; 1967, ch. 198, § 7; 1968, ch. 526, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-707; Acts 2012, ch. 833, § 3; 2019, ch. 476, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The fiscal review committee is authorized to hire an executive director, subject to a vote of the majority of the membership of the committee, and other such personnel as the committee determines is necessary.“(b) The executive director shall be a graduate of an accredited college or university and shall have five (5) or more years of experience in the field of professional financial management, administrative services management or related professional managerial experience, or governmental experience in relation to the fiscal or budget process. The executive director of the fiscal review committee and other personnel shall be chosen without reference to party affiliation but solely on the basis of fitness to perform the duties of the office. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the committee.“(c) The committee shall determine the compensation of the director, while the compensation of other personnel shall be determined by the committee upon recommendation of the director. Personnel shall be employed on recommendation of the director with the approval of the committee.“(d) For administrative purposes, the fiscal review committee is attached to the general assembly. The office of legislative administration shall assist the fiscal review committee with personnel, payroll and other administrative functions.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 476, § 4. May 24, 2019.

Cross-References. Staff for committee, §3-7-103.

3-7-108. Provisions supplemental.

This chapter is supplementary to chapter 3 of this title, title 8, chapter 4, and title 9, chapter 6.

Acts 1967, ch. 12, § 8; 1967, ch. 198, § 8; T.C.A., § 3-708.

Compiler's Notes. The provisions of title 9, chapter 6, as referred to in this section, were either transferred to title 9, chapter 4, or repealed in 1984.

3-7-109. Determination of fiscal impact of compromise and settlement of civil litigation.

The director of the fiscal review committee shall review all reports submitted to it by the attorney general and reporter pursuant to § 8-6-109(b)(11), and shall notify the speaker of each house of the general assembly and the attorney general and reporter of any pending lawsuit in which the director concludes there is a substantial likelihood that adjudication will result in a significant increase in state expenditures.

The fiscal review committee shall at least biennially establish the monetary minimum amounts that shall be the significant increase in state expenditures which are used for the purposes of §§ 8-6-109(d) and 20-13-103. From April 8, 1986, and until such monetary minimum amount or amounts are established by the fiscal review committee, the monetary minimum amount for the purposes of §§ 8-6-109(d) and 20-13-103 shall be two million dollars ($2,000,000). The comptroller of the treasury shall determine the lawsuits to which the state is a party and in which a decision may affect the bond rating of the state for the purposes of §§ 8-6-109(d) and 20-13-103. The director of the fiscal review committee shall review all reports submitted by the attorney general and reporter pursuant to § 8-6-109(d), and advise the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, or the director of the office of legal services or the director's designee on such reports when requested.

Acts 1981, ch. 287, § 2; 1986, ch. 728, § 3.

3-7-110. Programs with reduced federal funds.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior to March 1 of each year, the fiscal review staff shall provide the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives and the fiscal review committee with information regarding the creation of state programs that have suffered significant reductions of federal financial support during the preceding year, including the terms of the initial agreement for the federal funding, time frames, and other pertinent requirements. As used in this section, “significant reductions” means reductions of ten percent (10%) or more in any given year.

There is established a federal grants monitoring and information management responsibility within the staffs of the fiscal review committee and the office of legislative budget analysis. The monitoring and information management responsibility shall be administered by one (1) staff person in the office of legislative budget analysis and one (1) staff person from the staff of the fiscal review committee. The staff of the fiscal review committee and the office of legislative budget analysis shall jointly monitor, analyze, and manage information concerning federal grants programs, including, but not limited to, social services grant funds, in order to inform members of the general assembly concerning such grants. The directors of the staff of the fiscal review committee and of the office of legislative budget analysis shall jointly make such reports as are appropriate to the speakers of the house of representatives and of the senate and to the fiscal review committee.

Acts 1983, ch. 259, § 1; 1998, ch. 1127, § 1; 1999, ch. 497, § 8; 2016, ch. 797, § 5.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the first sentence of (a) which read: “Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, prior to March 1 of each year, the fiscal review staff shall provide the senate and house finance, ways and means committees and the fiscal review committee with demographic information which reflects the nature and scope of services provided by state programs which have suffered significant reductions of federal financial support during the preceding year and which also generally identifies the level of reduced services likely to result from such reductions.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 797, § 19. April 14, 2016.

3-7-111. [Repealed.]

Acts 1986, ch. 670, § 3; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 673, § 1, effective July 1, 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former §3-7-111 concerned the examination of Reelfoot Lake related state and local expenditures.

3-7-112. Contract services subcommittee.

Within the fiscal review committee there is created a contract services subcommittee, the members of which shall be appointed by the chair of the fiscal review committee. The chair of the fiscal review committee shall determine the number of members of the subcommittee and shall appoint the chair of the subcommittee. For purposes of determining a quorum to conduct business, other members of the fiscal review committee may serve as pro tempore members of the subcommittee.

The purpose of the subcommittee is to become knowledgeable about the state's use of contract services and to impart this knowledge to the members of the general assembly. This function is one of continuing review.

The contract services subcommittee shall review the state's fee-for-service type contracts. These contracts include:

Fee-for-service contracts;

Direct purchase authority contracts;

Interdepartmental contracts; and

Government contracts other than the state.

The contract services subcommittee may also review the state's contracts involving:

Grants;

Grants to governments;

Departmental grant authority;

No cost contracts;

Revenue contracts; and

Memoranda of agreement.

During the course of its review the subcommittee shall make inquiry of each appropriate state governmental entity concerning:

The number of contracts outstanding;

The amount of money involved;

The length of the contracts;

The criteria for the use of contract services;

The savings realized by the use of contract services; and

Such other information as the subcommittee may require.

The subcommittee shall utilize the existing staff of the committee.

The subcommittee shall report annually on the state's use of contract services to the general assembly. In addition to its annual report, the subcommittee may make such special reports to the general assembly or a standing committee thereof as the subcommittee finds appropriate.

The contract services subcommittee shall not infringe upon any matter presently within the scope of the study of the information systems council.

Acts 1992, ch. 844, § 2; 2009, ch. 551, § 1.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

3-7-113. Review and discussion of any audit.

The fiscal review committee shall review and discuss any audit of a department, agency or institution of this state prepared by the comptroller of the treasury, pursuant to §8-4-109, subject to the following:

The fiscal review staff shall first review all audits of state departments, agencies or institutions prepared by the comptroller, pursuant to § 8-4-109, in conjunction with the chair or chairs of the fiscal review committee or the chairs' selected designees, for analysis and selection of such audits as deemed necessary for formal review by the fiscal review committee;

Effective January 1, 2007, the fiscal review staff shall forward to the chair or chairs of the fiscal review committee any above mentioned audit that contains a finding, or substantially similar finding, that has been repeated in three (3) or more consecutive audit reports;

Except in extraordinary circumstances, all audit reviews by the staff and committee pursuant to this section shall be conducted while the general assembly is not in session; and

This section does not limit the jurisdiction of the committee to review matters contained in other audits performed by the comptroller.

Acts 2005, ch. 449, § 1.

3-7-114. Identification and listing of acts null and void for lack of first year's funding by general assembly appropriation.

Within forty-five (45) days following the conclusion of each fiscal year, the fiscal review committee shall identify and list each law enacted during the fiscal year that is null and void for lack of a timely appropriation providing the estimated first year's funding for the law, as required by Article II, § 24 of the Constitution of Tennessee. The list shall be promptly delivered to the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission.

Acts 2006, ch. 646, § 1.